District of Columbia statutes.
23-112

Consecutive and concurrent sentences.

A sentence imposed on a person for conviction of an offense shall, unless the court imposing such sentence expressly provides otherwise, run consecutively to any other sentence imposed on such person for conviction of an offense, whether or not the offense (1) arises out of another transaction, or (2) arises out of the same transaction and requires proof of a fact which the other does not.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 610, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Theft and other crimes, prohibition of consecutive sentences, see § 22-3203.
1981 Ed., § 23-112.
1973 Ed., § 23-112.